South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3229.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 39, Title 27 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 27-39-70. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a landlord in this State may not require a potential tenant to provide his credit score on a rental application or as a condition to a rental agreement. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----